Missouri, session 2026, SB1213.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 191.1067, to read as
follows:
191.1067. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "340B covered entity" or "covered entity", an
entity described in 42 U.S.C. Section 256b(a)(4) that:
(a) Is authorized to participate in the federal 340B
Drug Pricing Program under Section 340B of the federal
Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 256b(a)(4), and
has a service address in this state as of January first of
the reporting year; or
(b) Any offsite outpatient facility affiliated under
the 340B program with an entity described in this
subdivision;
(2) "340B program" or "340B drug pricing program", the
federal 340B Drug Pricing Program established under 42
U.S.C. Section 256b;

SB 1213 2
(3) "Charity care", the unreimbursed cost to a covered
entity of providing, funding, or otherwise financially
supporting health care services:
(a) To a person classified by the covered entity as
financially indigent or medically indigent on an inpatient
or outpatient basis; or
(b) To financially indigent patients through other
nonprofit or public outpatient clinics, hospitals, or health
care organizations;
(4) "Financially indigent", an uninsured or
underinsured person who is accepted for care with no
obligation or a discounted obligation to pay for the
services rendered based on the covered entity's financial
criteria and procedures used to determine if a patient is
eligible for charity care, provided that the criteria and
procedures include income levels and means testing indexed
to the federal poverty guidelines. A covered entity may
determine that a person is financially or medically indigent
under the covered entity's eligibility system after health
care services are provided;
(5) "Medically indigent", a person whose medical bills
after payment by third-party payers exceed a specified
percentage of the patient's annual gross income as
determined in accordance with the covered entity's
eligibility system, and who is financially unable to pay the
remaining bill.
2. Before April first of each year, a 340B covered
entity shall report to the department of health and senior
services the following information and transactions
concerning the 340B covered entity's participation in, or
participation on behalf of the 340B covered entity in, the
federal 340B program for the previous calendar year:

SB 1213 3
(1) The 340B covered entity's:
(a) Name;
(b) Service address;
(c) 340B program identification number; and
(d) Designation of entity type as specified in 42
U.S.C. Section 256b(a)(4);
(2) The aggregate acquisition cost for all
prescription drugs obtained under the 340B program and
dispensed or administered to patients;
(3) The aggregate payment amount received for all
drugs obtained under the 340B program and dispensed or
administered to patients;
(4) The aggregate payment made to pharmacies under
contract to dispense drugs obtained under the 340B program;
(5) The number of claims for prescription drugs
described in subdivision (3) of this subsection;
(6) How the 340B covered entity uses any savings from
participating in the 340B program, including the amount of
savings used for the provision of charity care, community
benefits, or a similar program of providing unreimbursed or
subsidized health care;
(7) The aggregate payments made to any other entity
that is not a 340B covered entity and is not a contract
pharmacy, as described in subdivision (4) of this
subsection, for managing any aspect of the 340B covered
entity's utilization of the 340B program;
(8) The aggregate payment made for any other
administering expense for the 340B program;
(9) The aggregate number of prescription drugs
dispensed or administered to patients for which a payment
was reported under subdivision (3) of this subsection;

SB 1213 4
(10) The percentage of the 340B covered entity's
claims that were for prescription drugs obtained under the
340B program;
(11) The number and percentage of low income patients
of the 340B covered entity that were served by a sliding fee
scale for a prescription drug dispensed or administered
under the 340B program;
(12) The 340B covered entity's total operating costs;
(13) The 340B covered entity's total costs for charity
care; and
(14) A copy of the 340B covered entity's financial
assistance policy for the reporting year.
3. The information required to be reported under
subdivisions (3) to (5) of subsection 2 of this section
shall, to the extent feasible, be reported by payer type,
including the following:
(1) Commercial;
(2) Medicaid or MO HealthNet;
(3) Medicare; and
(4) Uninsured.
4. The data submitted in the reports required under
100 subsection 2 of this section shall be closed records under
101 chapter 610.
102 5. Before November fifteenth of each year, the
103 department of health and senior services shall prepare a
104 report that aggregates the data submitted under subsections
105 2 and 3 of this section, shall provide the report to the
106 general assembly in electronic format, and shall publish the
107 report on the department's publicly accessible website.
108 6. A 340B covered entity that fails to provide the
109 information required under subsection 2 or 3 of this section
110 by the date required in this section shall be subject to a

SB 1213 5
111 civil penalty of one thousand dollars per day the
112 information is past due.
✓